Utah statutes.
48-1d-904.   Power to bind partnership after dissolution.

(1)  A partnership is bound by a partner's act after dissolution which:

(a)  is appropriate for winding up the partnership's activities and affairs; or

(b)  would have bound the partnership under Section 48-1d-301 before dissolution, if, at the time the other party enters into the transaction, the other party does not know or have notice of the dissolution.

(2)  A person dissociated as a partner binds a partnership through an act occurring after dissolution if at the time the other party enters into the transaction:

(a)  less than two years has passed since the dissociation;

(b)  the other party does not have notice of the dissociation and reasonably believes that the person is a partner; and

(c)  the act:

(i)  is appropriate for winding up the partnership's activities and affairs; or

(ii)  would have bound the partnership under Section 48-1d-301 before dissolution, and at the time the other party enters into the transaction the other party does not know or have notice of the dissolution.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

